Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 10 FINANCES
§ 50-1030. Powers.

In addition to the powers which it may now have, any city shall have power under and subject to the following provisions:

To acquire by gift or purchase and to construct, reconstruct, improve, better or extend any works within or without the city, or partially within or partially without the city, or within any part of the city, and acquire by gift or purchase lands or rights in lands or water rights in connection therewith, including easements, rights-of-way, contract rights, leases, franchises, approaches, dams and reservoirs; to sell excess or surplus water under such terms as are in compliance with section 42-222, Idaho Code, and deemed advisable by the city; to lease any portion of the excess or surplus capacity of any such works to any party located within or without the city, subject to the following conditions: that such capacity shall be returned or replaced by the lessee when and as needed by such city for the purposes set forth in section 50-1028, Idaho Code, as determined by the city; that the city shall not be made subject to any debt or liability thereby; and the city shall not pledge any of its faith or credit in aid to such lessee;

To rehabilitate existing electric generating facilities;

To exercise the right of eminent domain for any of the works, purposes or uses provided by this act, in like manner and to the same extent as provided in section 7-720, Idaho Code;

To operate and maintain any works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities within or without the boundaries of the city, or partially within or without the boundaries of the city, or within any part of the city;

To issue its revenue bonds hereunder to finance, in whole or in part, the cost of the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment or extension of any works, or to finance, in whole or in part, the cost of the rehabilitation of existing electrical generating facilities;

To prescribe and collect rates, fees, tolls or charges, including the levy or assessment of such rates, fees, tolls or charges against governmental units, departments or agencies, including the state of Idaho and its subdivisions, for the services, facilities and commodities furnished by such works, or by such rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, and to provide methods of collections and penalties, including denial of service for nonpayment of such rates, fees, tolls or charges;

To pledge an amount of revenue from such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, including improvement, betterment or extensions thereto, thereafter constructed or acquired, sufficient to pay said bonds and interest as the same shall become due, and to create and maintain reasonable reserves therefor. Such amount may consist of all or any part or portion of such revenues. In determining such cost, there may be included all costs and estimated costs of the issuance of said bonds; all engineering, inspection, fiscal and legal expenses and interest which it is estimated will accrue during the construction period and for six (6) months thereafter on money borrowed or which it is estimated will be borrowed pursuant to sections 50-1027 through 50-1042, Idaho Code, and the costs of any bond reserve funds or working capital deemed necessary in connection with the bond issue;

In the procurement of off-street parking sites, facilities, equipment and appurtenances, any city shall have power, in addition to those heretofore conferred, to pledge the net revenues to be derived from on-street parking facilities not otherwise pledged, to be combined with the rates, fees, tolls and charges to be derived from the operation of off-street parking facilities, after the payment of all operative and maintenance costs, to the payment of revenue bonds and interest thereon issued under the authority of the revenue bond act;

To issue bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds theretofore issued under authority of the revenue bond act and to pay accrued interest and applicable redemption premiums on the bonds to be refunded, if the bonds to be refunded are due, callable or redeemable by their terms on or prior to the date that the refunding bonds are issued, or will become due, callable or redeemable by their terms within twelve (12) months thereafter, or if the bonds to be refunded, even though not becoming due, callable or redeemable within such period, are voluntarily surrendered by the holders thereof, for cancellation at the time of the issuance of the refunding bonds. All or part of any issue may be refunded and all or part of several issues may be refunded into a single issue of refunding bonds. There may be included with the refunding bonds, as part of a single issue, or in combination in one (1) or more series, bonds for any other purpose or purposes for which bonds are authorized to be issued under the revenue bond act. Refunding bonds shall be issued and secured in such manner as may be provided in the proceedings authorizing their issuance and as otherwise provided in the revenue bond act, and such changes may be made in the security and revenue pledged to the payment of the bonds so refunded, as provided by the governing body in the proceedings authorizing such bonds. No election on the issuance of refunding bonds shall be required, but if by an increase in the amount of bonds or by changes in the security or pledged revenues, the requirements of the constitution for an election shall become applicable, or if refunding bonds are combined into a single issue with bonds authorized for nonrefunding purposes, then such bonds with changes in security or revenues, or such bonds in excess of the amount of bonds refunded, as the case may be, must have been approved at an election as otherwise provided in the revenue bond act and the constitution. Refunding bonds may be exchanged for not less than a like principal amount of bonds authorized to be refunded, may be sold, or may be exchanged in part and sold in part. If sold, the proceeds of the sale, not required for the payment of expenses, and in any event, in an amount sufficient to assure the retirement of the bonds refundable, when such bonds become available for retirement, if not applied to a simultaneous payment and cancellation of the bonds refunded shall be escrowed with a bank or trust company and may be invested in United States government obligations or in obligations unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America in such manner as may be provided in the authorizing proceedings;

To issue its revenue bonds for airport facilities and air navigation facilities to be held by the political subdivision of the state or regional airport authority as defined by law payable solely from fees, charges, rents, payments, grants or any other revenues derived from the airport or any of its facilities, structures, systems of projects, or from any land, facilities, buildings, projects or other property financed by such bonds; and to issue special facility bonds for airport facilities and air navigation facilities to be financed for, or to be leased, sold or otherwise disposed of to private persons, associations or corporations, to pledge to the payment of such bonds the fees, charges, rents, payments, grants, or any other revenues from the financed facilities and to secure such bonds by a deed of trust, mortgage or other lien on the financed property or by other security or credit enhancement; and neither airport revenue bonds nor special facility bonds shall be secured by the full faith and credit or the taxing power of the political subdivision of the state or regional airport authority as defined by law.

§ 50-1031. Supervision of projects.

The construction, acquisition, improvement, equipment, custody, operation and maintenance of any works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities under the provisions of this act, and the collection of revenues therefrom for the service rendered thereby, shall be under the supervision and control of the governing body of the city.

§ 50-1032. Projects to be self-supporting.

The council of a city issuing bonds pursuant to this act shall prescribe and collect reasonable rates, fees, tolls or charges for the services, facilities and commodities furnished by such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, and shall revise such rates, fees, tolls or charges from time to time, to provide that all such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities shall be and always remain self-supporting. The rates, fees, tolls or charges prescribed shall be such as will produce revenue at least sufficient, (a) to pay when due all bonds and interest thereon for the payment of which such revenue is or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered including reserves therefor, and (b) to provide for all expenses of operation and maintenance of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, including reserves therefor.

§ 50-1033. Use of projects — Revenue.

Any city issuing bonds under sections 50-1027 through 50-1042, Idaho Code, for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment or extension of any works or to rehabilitate existing electrical generating facilities, shall have the right to appropriate, apply or expend the revenue of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities for the following purposes: (a) to pay when due all bonds and interest thereon, for the payment of which such revenue is or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered, including reserves therefor; (b) to provide for all expenses of operation, maintenance, replacement and depreciation of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, including reserves therefor; (c) to pay and discharge notes, bonds or other obligations and interest thereon, not issued under this act for the payment of which the revenue of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities may have been pledged, charged or encumbered; (d) to pay and discharge notes, bonds or other obligations and interest thereon which do not constitute a lien, charge or encumbrance on the revenue of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, which may have been issued for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment or extension of such works or to rehabilitate existing electrical generating facilities; and (e) provide a reserve for improvements to such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities. Unless and until full and adequate provision has been made for the foregoing purposes, no city shall have the right to transfer the revenue of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities to its general fund.

§ 50-1034. Preliminary expenses.

The city may provide for the payment of all necessary preliminary expenses actually incurred in the making of surveys, estimates of costs and revenues, employment of engineers and other employees, making of notices, taking of options, legal and clerical help and all other expenses necessary to be made and paid prior to the authorization for the issuance of such revenue bonds, provided, that no such expenditures shall be made or paid unless an appropriation has been made therefor in the same manner as is required by law for city funds. Any funds so expended by the city shall be fully reimbursed and repaid to the city out of the sale of such revenue bonds before any other disbursements are made therefrom, and the amount so advanced by the city to pay such preliminary expenses shall be a first charge against the proceeds resulting from the sale of such revenue bonds until the same has been repaid as herein provided.

§ 50-1035. Ordinance prior to construction — Election.

Before any city shall construct or acquire any works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities under this chapter, the council of such city shall enact an ordinance or ordinances which shall, (a) set forth a brief and general description of the works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, and if the same are to be constructed, a reference to the preliminary report or plans and specifications which shall theretofore have been prepared and filed by an engineer chosen for that purpose; (b) set forth the cost thereof estimated by the engineer chosen as aforesaid; (c) order the construction or acquisition of such works or the rehabilitation of such existing electrical generating facilities; (d) direct that revenue bonds of the city shall be issued pursuant to this chapter in such amount as may be necessary to pay the cost of the works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities; and (e) contain such other provisions as may be necessary in the proposal.

Such ordinance shall be passed, approved and published as provided by law for the enactment of general ordinances, but such city shall not incur or authorize in any year any indebtedness or liability under said ordinance exceeding in that year, the income and revenue provided for it for such year, without the assent of two-thirds (2/3) of the qualified electors of such city voting at an election held for the purpose of authorizing or refusing to authorize the indebtedness or liability provided for in said ordinance; provided, that any city may, with the assent of a majority of the qualified electors voting at an election to be held for such purpose, issue revenue bonds for the purpose of providing funds to own, purchase, construct, extend or equip, within and without the corporate limits of such city, water systems, sewerage systems, water treatment plants, sewerage treatment plants, electric systems, or to rehabilitate existing electrical generating facilities, the principal and interest of which to be paid solely from the revenue derived from rates and charges for the use of, and the service rendered by such systems, plants and facilities. In accordance with section 3E, article VIII of the constitution of the state of Idaho, any political subdivision of the state or regional airport authority as defined by law, operating an airport may issue revenue bonds payable solely from fees, charges, rents, payments, grants or any other revenues derived from or relating to airport facilities and air navigation facilities to finance the costs of acquiring, constructing, installing and equipping airport facilities and air navigation facilities and such bonds shall not be secured by the full faith and credit or the taxing power of the political subdivision of the state or regional airport authority as defined by law.

Said ordinances shall provide for the holding of said election in accordance with the dates authorized in section 50-405, Idaho Code, by the county clerk in accordance with the provisions of title 34, Idaho Code. The notice of election shall set forth the purpose of said ordinance, the amount of bonds authorized by it, the maximum number of years from their respective dates for which such bonds may run, the voting places, the hours between which the polls will be open and the qualifications of voters who may vote thereat. In all other respects such election shall be conducted as are other city elections. The voting at such elections must be by ballot, and the ballots used shall be substantially as follows:
“In favor of issuing revenue bonds for the purposes provided by Ordinance No. . . . . .”

“Against the issuance of revenue bonds for the purposes provided by Ordinance No. . . . . .”

If, at such election, the required vote is in favor of issuing such revenue bonds, then such city may issue such bonds and create such indebtedness or liability in the manner and for the purpose specified in said ordinance.

§ 50-1035A. Issuance of revenue bonds at rates of interest in excess of original specification.

Any city may issue revenue bonds of the city bearing interest at such rate or rates as shall be prescribed by ordinance if:

The principal amount of such revenue bonds does not exceed the then unissued balance of the principal amount of revenue bonds of the same type authorized at an election heretofore held in the city;

The revenue bonds are issued for the same purpose as that for which the unissued bonds were authorized; and

The bonds are issued in accordance with the provisions of the revenue bond act; provided, that an election shall have been held and conducted in the manner provided in section 50-1035, Idaho Code, on the proposition of issuing revenue bonds under the provisions of this section at a rate or rates of interest in excess of the maximum rate of interest specified in the notice of election at which the unissued bonds were authorized and the proposition shall have been approved by the same percentage of the qualified electors of the city voting at the election as was required in section 50-1035, Idaho Code, at the election at which the unissued bonds were authorized.

§ 50-1036. Bonds — Form — Conditions — Bond anticipation notes.

All revenue bonds issued under authority of this act shall be sold, executed and delivered in the same manner as provided by the municipal bond law for the sale of general obligation negotiable coupon bonds, except that issues of revenue bonds may, in the discretion of the governing body, be sold at a private sale without advertising the same at competitive bidding and at a price above, at, or below par. The ordinance authorizing the issuance of said bonds shall prescribe the form of bonds. Said bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates, payable annually, or at such lesser intervals as may be prescribed by ordinance; may be in one (1) or more series, bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, and be redeemable before maturity at the option of the city; may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to such terms of redemption, may contain such terms, covenants and conditions, and may be in such form, either coupon or registered, as such ordinance may provide. Pending preparation of the bonds, interim certificates, in such form and with such provisions as the council may determine, may be issued. Said bonds and interim certificates shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the negotiable instruments law.

provide for the initial issuance of one (1) or more bonds, in this act called “bond,” aggregating the amount of the entire issue;

make such provision for instalment payments of the principal amount of any such bond as it may consider desirable;

provide for the making of any such bond payable to bearer or otherwise, registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest, and where interest accruing thereon is not represented by interest coupons, for the indorsing of payments of interest on such bonds; and

further make provision in any such proceedings for the manner and circumstances in and under which any such bond may in the future, at the request of the holder thereof, be converted into bonds of smaller denominations, which bonds of smaller denominations may in turn be either coupon bonds or bonds registrable as to principal, or principal and interest, or both.

Whenever the governing body considers it advisable and in the interests of the city to anticipate the issuance of revenue bonds to be issued under this act, the governing body may from time to time and pursuant to appropriate resolution issue bond anticipation notes. Each resolution authorizing the issuance of bond anticipation notes shall:

describe the revenue bonds in anticipation of which the notes are to be issued; and

shall specify the principal amount of the notes, the rate of interest and maturity date of the notes, which maturity date shall be not to exceed five (5) years from the date of issue of such notes; but the time of payment of any such notes may be extended for a period of not exceeding three (3) years from their maturity date.
Bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold from time to time in such manner and at such price as the governing body shall by resolution determine. Bond anticipation notes shall be in bearer form, except that the governing body may provide for the registration of the notes in the name of the owner either as to principal alone, or as to principal and interest, and on such terms and conditions as the governing body may determine in the authorizing resolution. Interest on bond anticipation notes may be made payable semiannually, annually, or at maturity. Bond anticipation notes may be made redeemable prior to maturity at the option of the governing body in the manner and upon the terms fixed by the resolution authorizing their issuance. Bond anticipation notes shall be executed and shall be in such form and have such details and terms as shall be provided in the authorizing resolution.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the municipal bond law, the governing body in any proceedings authorizing bonds under this act may:

Contemporaneously with the issuance of the revenue bonds in anticipation of which bond anticipation notes are issued, all bond anticipation notes so issued, even though they may not then have matured, shall be paid, both as to principal and interest, to date of payment; and all such notes shall be surrendered and canceled.

Bond anticipation notes and the interest on them shall be secured by a pledge of the income and revenues derived by the city from the project to be undertaken with the proceeds of the bond anticipation notes and shall also be made payable from funds derived from the sale of the revenue bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued.

Bond anticipation notes may be refunded by the issuance of other bond anticipation notes maturing within not more than eight (8) years from the date of the issuance of the initial issue of bond anticipation notes for which this refunding is to be effected.

§ 50-1037. Bonds — Issuance — Terms — Conditions.

Whenever revenue bonds are authorized to be issued, the city council shall by ordinance provide for the issuance thereof. The ordinance authorizing the issuance of said revenue bonds, for the purpose authorized, shall contain covenants as to:

The purpose or purposes to which the proceeds of the sale of said bonds may be applied and the use and disposition thereof;

The use and disposition of the revenue of the works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities for which said bonds are to be issued, including the creation and maintenance of reserves;

The transfer from the general fund of the city to the account or accounts of the works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, of a sum or sums of money for furnishing the city or any of its departments, boards or agencies with the services, facilities and commodities of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities;

The issuance of other or additional bonds payable from the revenue of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities;

The operation and maintenance of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities;

The insurance to be carried thereon, the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

Books of account and inspection and audit thereof;

The appointment and duties of a trustee. Provisions may be made for the securing of the bonds by a trust indenture, but no such indenture shall convey, mortgage or create any lien upon property of the city;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders thereof or any trustee therefor shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver which receiver may enter and take possession of such works, operate and maintain the same, prescribe rates, fees, tolls or charges and collect, receive and apply all revenue thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the city itself might do. The provisions of this section and of any such ordinance shall be a contract with the holder of said bonds, and the duties of the city and its council under this section and under such ordinance, shall be enforceable by the holder by mandamus or other appropriate suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity.

§ 50-1038. Validity of bonds.

Any ordinance authorizing said bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to section [sections] 50-1027 through 50-1042[, Idaho Code], which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

§ 50-1039. Lien of bonds.

All bonds of the same issue shall, subject to the prior and superior rights of outstanding bonds, claims or obligations, have prior and paramount lien on the revenue of the works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities for which said bonds have been issued, except that where provision is made in the ordinance authorizing any issue or series of bonds for the issuance of additional bonds in the future on a parity therewith pursuant to procedures or restrictions provided in such ordinance, additional bonds may be issued in the future on a parity with such issue or series in the manner so provided in such ordinance. All bonds of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured without priority by reason of number, date of bonds, date of sale, date of execution, or date of delivery, by a lien on said revenue in accordance with the provisions of the Revenue Bond Act and the ordinance authorizing said bonds. Special facility bonds issued for airport facilities and air navigation facilities to be owned by private persons, associations or corporations and not by the political subdivision of the state or regional airport authority as defined by law shall be additionally secured by a deed of trust, mortgage or other lien on the facilities or other security or credit enhancement provisions.

§ 50-1040. City not liable on bonds.

Bonds issued pursuant to sections 50-1027 through 50-1042[, Idaho Code,] shall not be a debt of the city and the city shall not be liable thereon, nor shall they be payable out of any funds other than the revenue pledged to the payment thereof. Each bond issued under the Revenue Bond Act shall recite, in substance, that said bond, including interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenue pledge [pledged] to the payment thereof. Bonds may be issued under sections 50-1027 through 50-1042[, Idaho Code,] notwithstanding and without regard to any limitation or restriction on the amount or percentage of indebtedness, or of outstanding obligations of a city.

§ 50-1041. Tax levy to pay bonds prohibited.

The provisions of [section] 57-203, Idaho Code, relating to the levy of taxes for the payment of bonds, shall not be applicable to bonds issued by a city under the Revenue Bond Act, and the principal or interest thereof shall not be charged upon the city issuing the same. The holder or holders of any bonds issued under the Revenue Bond Act shall not have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the city to pay said bonds or the interest thereon.

§ 50-1042. Projects and bonds exempt from taxation.

So long as a city shall own any works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities, the property and revenue of such works or rehabilitated existing electrical generating facilities shall be exempt from taxation. Bonds issued under sections 50-1027 through 50-1042, Idaho Code, and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation, except transfer and estate taxes.

§ 50-1043. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “City Property Tax Alternatives Act of 1978.”

§ 50-1044. Authority for resort city residents to approve and resort city governments to adopt, implement and collect certain city nonproperty taxes.

The voters of any resort city with a population not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) according to the most recent census within the state of Idaho, organized under the general laws of the state, special charter, or a general incorporation act, are hereby given the freedom to authorize their city government to adopt, implement and collect one (1) or more local-option nonproperty taxes as provided herein. A resort city is a city that derives the major portion of its economic well-being from businesses catering to recreational needs and meeting needs of people traveling to that destination city for an extended period of time. The corporate authorities of any such resort city are hereby given the freedom and authority to adopt, implement and collect one (1) or more local-option nonproperty taxes as provided herein, if approved by the required majority of city voters voting in an election as provided herein. No local-option nonproperty tax proposal may be presented to resort city voters for approval or modification for a period of eleven (11) months after an election to approve or disapprove such tax. The election may be a special election conducted for the exclusive purpose of approving or disapproving such tax or may be conducted as a part of any other special or general city election.

§ 50-1045. City property tax relief fund.

Any resort city may establish a city property tax relief fund into which may be placed all or any portion of revenues received from any nonproperty tax levied in accordance with the provisions of this act and such nonproperty tax revenues may be used to replace city property taxes in the ensuing fiscal year by the amount of nonproperty tax revenues placed in the city property tax relief fund if city voters have approved of such use of nonproperty tax revenues in the election authorizing such city nonproperty tax. Any resort city that receives more revenues from any local-option nonproperty tax than such city has budgeted shall establish a city property tax relief fund into which shall be placed all revenues received in excess of the budget amount and such excess revenues shall be used to replace city property taxes in the ensuing fiscal year by the amount of all excess revenues placed in said city property tax relief fund.

§ 50-1046. City local-option nonproperty taxes permitted by sixty per cent majority vote.

A sixty per cent (60%) majority of the voters of any resort city voting on the question may approve and, upon such approval, any city may adopt, implement, and collect, subject to the provisions of this act, the following city local-option nonproperty taxes: (a) an occupancy tax upon hotel, motel, and other sleeping accommodations rented or leased for a period of thirty (30) days or less; (b) a tax upon liquor by-the-drink, wine and beer sold at retail for consumption on the licensed premises; and (c) a sales tax upon part or all of sales subject to taxation under chapter 36, title 63, Idaho Code.

§ 50-1047. General provisions.

Any ordinance assessing a tax pursuant to this act shall contain a finding by the local governing body of the city based upon evidence presented to it that the condition set forth in section 50-1044, Idaho Code, exists and shall provide the methods for reporting and collecting taxes due. Taxes collected pursuant to any such ordinance shall be remitted to the city official designated in such ordinance or other such official contracting, pursuant to this act, with the city to provide collection services, and shall constitute revenue of the city available for any lawful corporate purpose approved by city voters subject to the provisions of this act. In any election, the ordinance submitted to city voters shall: (a) state and define the specific tax to be approved; (b) state the exact rate of the tax to be assessed; (c) state the exact purpose or purposes for which the revenues derived from the tax shall be used; and (d) state the duration of the tax. No tax shall be redefined, no rate shall be increased, no purpose shall be modified, and no duration shall be extended without subsequent approval of city voters. An ordinance adopting any local-option nonproperty tax authorized by this act may provide for separate identification of taxes as may be appropriate. The city clerk of any city adopting an ordinance pursuant to this act shall, immediately following approval of such ordinance, or any amendment thereto, forward a copy of said ordinance or amendment to the chairman of the state tax commission, and the chairman of the state board of tax appeals.

§ 50-1048. Coordination with county local-option nonproperty taxes.

In the event that counties are given local-option nonproperty tax authority, it is the intent of the legislature that such county local-option nonproperty taxes be coordinated with existing city local-option nonproperty taxes in the county.

§ 50-1049. Collection and administration of local-option nonproperty taxes by state tax commission — Distribution.

A city which has levied a tax pursuant to section 50-1044, Idaho Code, may contract with the state tax commission for the collection and administration of such taxes in like manner and under the definitions, rules and regulations of the tax commission for the collection and administration of the state sales tax under chapter 36, title 63, Idaho Code. A city which levies such tax shall have the right to review and audit the records of collection thereof maintained by the commission and the returns of taxpayers relating to such tax. Alternatively, such city shall have authority to administer and collect such tax.

All revenues collected by the tax commission pursuant to section 50-1044, Idaho Code, shall be distributed as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the commission to be paid shall be paid through the state refund account and those moneys are continuously appropriated;

An amount of money equal to such fee as may be agreed upon between the commission and such city for the actual cost of the collection and administration of the tax. The amount retained by the commission shall not exceed the amount authorized to be expended by appropriation by the legislature. Any unencumbered balance in excess of the actual cost at the end of each fiscal year shall be distributed as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection;

All remaining moneys received pursuant to this chapter shall be placed in an account designated by the state controller and remitted monthly to the city levying such tax.